Oklahoma, session 2026, SB483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 391 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The board of county commissioners of any county of this
state shall have the authority to establish a relocation assistance
program. The board shall allow for the donation of private funds to
carry out the purposes of such program. Such program shall provide
an eligible participant who voluntarily elects to participate in the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB483 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prog ram the opportunity to receive travel and relocation support
paid by the county to a destination where such participant has a
family member, employer, or other person who is willing to receive
and support the participant.
B. No individual shall be eligible for participation in a
relocation assistance program who:
1. Is on parole or probation, unless he or she has received
approval from his or her parole agent or probation officer and the
individual is authorized by law to move to a different jurisdiction;
2. Is unable to travel alone due to disability or because he or
she poses a direct risk to himself or herself or others;
3. Is not sober at the time when the individual will begin to
travel or is unable to abstain from drinking alcohol or using
illicit substances while traveling to his or her destination;
4. Has participated in a relocation assistance program within
this state within the previous two (2) years;
5. Is not a homeless person; or
6. Is a minor traveling with an adult, unless the adult is a
parent or guardian of the minor and the adult has photo
identification, a birth certificate, or other legal verification
proving that the adult is the minor’s parent or guardian.
C. Before providing transportation to a destination, a county
commissioner or an employee of the county tasked with overseeing the
relocation assistance program shall make direct contact with the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB483 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fami ly member, employer, or other person who is willing to receive
and support the individual participating in the program. The family
member, employer, or other person must attest that he or she is
willing to receive and support the individual, and the county
commissioner or employee shall document the attestation. Within
ninety (90) days following the date of the individual participating
in the program’s departure, the county commissioner or employee
shall attempt to contact the participant to determine whether the
individual has retained housing.
D. A county that conducts a relocation assistance program shall
not be liable for any claims of injuries or damages.
E. As used in this section, “homeless person” means any person
or family who:
a. lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence,
b. has as a primary nighttime residence a publicly or
privately operated shelter designed to provide
temporary living accommodations, or
c. has as a primary nighttime residence a public or
private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as,
a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.
The term includes those persons and families who do not have
access to normal accommodations as a result of violence or the
threat of violence from a cohabitant.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB483 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB483 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)